Rhode Island, session 2025, SB206.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 8-16.1-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 8-16.1 entitled "Judicial
Selection" is hereby amended to read as follows:
8-16.1-6. Nomination and appointment of judges.
(a)(1) The governor shall immediately notify the commission of any vacancy or
prospective vacancy of a judge of any state court other than the Rhode Island supreme court. The
commission shall advertise for each vacancy and solicit prospective candidates and shall consider
names submitted from any source. Within ninety (90) days of any vacancy, the commission shall
publicly submit the names of not less than three (3), and not more than five (5), highly qualified
persons for each vacancy to the governor. The governor shall fill any vacancy of any judge of the
Rhode Island superior court, family court, district court, workers’ compensation court, or any other
state court that the general assembly may, from time to time, establish, by nominating one of the
three (3) to five (5) highly qualified persons forwarded to him or her by the commission for the
court where the vacancy occurs.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, for the period of five (5) years following
July 1, 2025, any individual whose name was publicly submitted to the governor by the
commission, as described in subsection (a)(1) of this section, shall also be eligible for subsequent
nomination by the governor for any vacancy, or prospective vacancy, of a judge in the same court
for with that particular individual had previously applied except for a vacancy in the position of
presiding justice, chief justice or chief judge.

(3) Such individuals shall remain eligible for nomination to fill any vacancy, or prospective
vacancy, with the same court to which they previously applied for a period of five (5) years from
the date their name or names were publicly submitted to the governor by the commission unless:
(i) Such individuals withdraw from future consideration in writing to the judicial
nominating commission; and/or
(ii) The judicial nominating commission votes to terminate the individual’s eligibility.
However, such individuals must reapply for any subsequent vacancy, or prospective vacancy, in
the same court for the position of presiding justice, chief justice, or chief judge. Any individual
who has applied for any vacancy or prospective vacancy must, after a period of five (5) years,
reapply in order to be considered for any vacancy or prospective vacancy in the court in which their
names were previously submitted.
(4) Subject to the eligibility requirements set forth in this section, the governor shall fill
any vacancy of any judge of the Rhode Island superior court, family court, district court, workers’
compensation court, or any other state court that the general assembly may, from time to time,
establish, by nominating one of the three (3) to five (5) highly qualified persons forwarded to the
governor by the commission for the court where the vacancy occurs, or by nomination another
individual who has previously applied for a vacancy or prospective vacancy within the same court
and whose name had been previously publicly submitted to the governor within the previous five
(5) years.
(5) The provisions of subsections (a)(2) through (a)(4) shall sunset and expire on July 1,
2028 unless extended by the general assembly.
(b) The governor shall fill any vacancy within twenty-one (21) days of the public
submission by the commission.
(c) Each nomination shall be forwarded forthwith to the secretary of the senate for
presentation to the senate, and by and with the advice and consent of the senate, each nominee shall
be appointed by the governor to serve subject to the general laws. The senate shall, after seven (7)
calendar days of receipt of the nomination consider the nomination, but if the senate fails within
ninety (90) days after the submission to confirm the nominee, or if the senate does not, by a majority
vote of its members, extend the deliberation an additional seven (7) calendar days, the governor
shall appoint some other person to fill the vacancy and shall submit his or her appointment to the
senate for confirmation in like manner until the senate shall confirm the nomination. If the nominee
is rejected by the senate, the commission shall submit a new list of three (3) to five (5) candidates
to the governor for the purpose of nomination in accordance with this chapter. Any new list may
include, but need not be limited to, the names of any candidates who were previously submitted to
LC000125/SUB A - Page 2 of 5

the governor by the commission but who were not forwarded to the senate for its advice and
consent.
(d) During the time for consideration of the nominees by the senate, the senate judiciary
committee shall conduct an investigation and public hearing on the question of the qualifications
of the nominee or nominees. At the public hearing, the testimony of every witness shall be taken
under oath and stenographic records shall be taken and maintained. Further, the senate judiciary
committee shall, during the course of its investigation and hearing, have the power upon majority
vote of the committee members present to issue witness subpoenas, subpoenas duces tecum, and
orders for the production of books, accounts, papers, records, and documents that shall be signed
and issued by the chairperson of the committee, or the person serving in his or her capacity. All
such subpoenas and orders shall be served as subpoenas in civil cases in the superior court are
served, and witnesses so subpoenaed shall be entitled to the same fees for attendance and travel as
provided for witnesses in civil cases in the superior court. If the person subpoenaed to attend before
the committee fails to obey the command of the subpoena without reasonable cause; refuse to be
sworn; or to be examined; or to answer a legal and pertinent question; or if any person shall refuse
to produce books, accounts, papers, records, and documents material to the issue, set forth in an
order duly served on him or her; the committee by majority vote of the committee members present
may apply to any justice of the superior court, for any county, upon proof by affidavit of the fact,
for a rule or order returnable in not less than two (2), nor more than five (5), days, directing the
person to show cause before the justice who made the order or any other justice of the superior
court, why he or she should not be adjudged in contempt. Upon the return of the order, the justice
before whom the matter is brought on for hearing shall examine under oath the person, and the
person shall be given an opportunity to be heard, and if the justice shall determine that the person
has refused without reasonable cause or legal excuse to be examined, or to answer a legal and
pertinent question, or to produce books, accounts, papers, records, and documents material to the
issue that he or she was ordered to bring or produce, he or she may forthwith commit the offender
to the adult correctional institutions, there to remain until the person submits to do the act which he
or she was so required to do, or is discharged according to law.
(e) The committee shall, for the purpose of investigating the qualifications of the nominee
or nominees, be furnished with a report compiled by the state police in conjunction with the attorney
general’s office indicating the determinations and findings of the state police and attorney general’s
office investigations concerning the background of the nominee or nominees, and the report shall
include, but not be limited to, the following:
(1) Whether the nominee has ever been convicted of, or pleaded guilty to, a misdemeanor
LC000125/SUB A - Page 3 of 5

or felony in this or any other state or foreign country;
(2) Whether the nominee has ever filed a personal bankruptcy petition or an assignment for
the benefit of creditors in this or any other state or foreign country; and whether the nominee has
ever been a partner in, held ten percent (10%) or more of stock in, or held office in any sole
proprietorship, partnership, or corporation that has been involved in bankruptcy or receivership
actions as a debtor or because of insolvency at the time the nominee was a partner in, held ten
percent (10%) or more stock in, or held office in any such sole proprietorship, partnership, or
corporation;
(3) Whether the nominee has ever had a civil judgment rendered against him or her arising
out of an allegation of fraud, misrepresentation, libel, slander, professional negligence, or any
intentional tort in this state or any other state or foreign country;
(4) The state police, in conjunction with the attorney general’s department, shall provide
in their report the names and addresses of each and every source of their information.
(f) The reports set forth in this section shall be delivered to the chairperson and members
of the senate judiciary committee in addition to the nominee or nominees only prior to the
commencement of the public hearing. Provided, however, that if the nominee or nominees
withdraw or decline the appointment prior to the public hearing, then the report or reports shall be
returned to the chairperson of the judiciary committee and destroyed.
(g) The committee shall also require a financial statement to be submitted by each nominee,
prior to the public hearing, to the chairperson of the senate judiciary committee, to investigate each
nominee to determine his or her compliance with the provisions of chapter 14 of title 36.
(h) Any associate justice of any state court who is appointed to serve as the chief or
presiding justice of that court on an interim basis shall retain his or her status as an associate justice
until the appointment to chief or presiding justice is made permanent.
(i) In case a vacancy shall occur when the senate is not in session, the governor shall appoint
some person from a list of three (3) to five (5) persons submitted to the governor by the commission
to fill the vacancy until the senate shall next convene, when the governor shall make an appointment
as provided in this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
========
LC000125/SUB A
========
LC000125/SUB A - Page 4 of 5